Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.24, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1289.24.
FIREARM REGULATION – STATE PREEMPTION
A. 1. The State Legislature hereby occupies and preempts the
entire field of legislation in this state touching in any way
firearms, air powered pistols, air powered rifles, knives, firearm
and ammunition components, ammunition and supplies to the complete
Req. No. 10802 Page 1

excl usion of any order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or regulation
by any municipality, agency, or other political subdivision of this
state. Any existing or future orders, policies, ordinances,
resolutions, or regulations in this field, except as provided for in
paragraph 2 of this subsection and subsection C of this section, are
null and void.
2. A municipality may adopt any ordinance:
a. relating to the discharge of firearms within the
jurisdiction of the municipality,
b. allowing the municipality to issue a traffic citation
for transporting a firearm improperly as provided for
in Section 1289.13A of this title, provided, however,
that penalties contained for violation of any
ordinance enacted pursuant to the provisions of this
subparagraph shall not exceed the penalties
established in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, and
c. allowing the municipality to issue a citation to an
individual or the parent or guardian of a minor who
discharges an air powered pistol or air powered rifle
in an intentional or negligent manner which causes the
projectile to leave the intended premises.
3. As provided in the preemption provisions of this section,
the otherwise lawful carrying or possession of a firearm under the
provisions of Chapter 53 of this title shall not be punishable by
Req. No. 10802 Page 2

any municipality, agency, or other political subdivision of this
state as disorderly conduct, disturbing the peace or similar offense
against public order.
4. A public or private school may create a policy regulating
the possession of knives on school property or in any school bus or
vehicle used by the school for purposes of transportation.
B. No municipality, agency, or other political subdivision of
this state shall adopt any order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or
regulation concerning in any way the sale, purchase, purchase delay,
transfer, ownership, use, keeping, possession, carrying, bearing,
transportation, licensing, permit, registration, taxation other than
sales and compensating use taxes or other controls on firearms,
knives, firearm and ammunition components, ammunition and supplies.
C. Except as hereinafter provided, this section shall not
prohibit any order, policy, ordinance or regulation by any
municipality concerning the confiscation of property used in
violation of the ordinances of the municipality as provided for in
Section 28-121 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Provided,
however, no municipal ordinance relating to transporting a firearm
or knife improperly may include a provision for confiscation of
property.
D. When a person's rights pursuant to the protection of the
preemption provisions of this section have been violated by any
order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or regulation promulgated or
Req. No. 10802 Page 3

enfo rced by any person, municipality, agency or other political
subdivision of the state, the person so violated shall have the
right to bring a civil action against the persons person, government
employee if the government employee was acting beyond the scope of
employment, municipality, and agency, or political subdivision
jointly and severally for injunctive relief or monetary damages or
both.
E. A court may require the person, municipality, agency or
political subdivision to pay reasonable expenses to the aggrieved
party in a civil action filed pursuant to the provisions of
subsection D of this section if:
1. The aggrieved party first provides written notice of the
unlawful order, policy, ordinance, resolution or regulation by
certified, first-class mail or service of process to the clerk of
the municipality or to the designated agent of the municipality,
agency or political subdivision and allows the person, municipality,
agency or political subdivision ninety (90) days to rescind, repeal
or otherwise abrogate the order, policy, ordinance, resolution or
regulation; and
2. A court rules in favor of the aggrieved person whose rights
were violated and the issue in controversy is governed by previously
settled law.
If the person, municipality, agency or political subdivision
fails to rescind, repeal or otherwise abrogate the unlawful order,
Req. No. 10802 Page 4

poli cy, ordinance, resolution or regulation within ninety (90) days
of required notice, as provided in paragraph 1 of this subsection
and the order, policy, ordinance, resolution or regulation is
subsequently rescinded, repealed or otherwise abrogated after the
aggrieved party files suit, the aggrieved party shall retain
standing in the suit and may recover damages or reasonable expenses.
F. As used in this section, air:
1. "Air powered pistol" or "air powered rifle" is any pistol or
rifle that uses compressed air or other compressed gas to project
plastic BB-like or pellet-like projectiles at a speed not exceeding
400 feet per second; and
2. "Reasonable expenses" includes, but is not limited to,
attorney fees, expert witness fees, and court costs.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10802 GRS 01/07/25





Req. No. 10802 Page 5